District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.08

Hearing by Office of Administrative Hearings.

(a)

In accordance with § 2-1831.03(b)(1), a party contesting the determination made by DOES shall be entitled to a hearing before the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(b)

Upon the exhaustion of administrative remedies, an employee aggrieved by the order of the Office of Administrative Hearings may bring an action in court.

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 9, 61 DCR 11368